src/prt-kal-lex.txt
! ======================= !
! Partikler og pronominer !
! ======================= !

LEXICON oqr

oqr-part ;    ! Partikler
!pronomener ;
adverbier ;

LEXICON adverbier
ik	upki ; 
kig	upki ;
ma	upki ;
qam	upki ;
taak	upki ; 
takkig	upki ;
tama	upki ;
taqqam	upki ;
tass	upki ;
uv	upki ;
av	upki_suaq ;
kan	upki_suaq ;
pav	upki_suaq ; 
pik	upki ;
qav	upki_suaq ; 
sam	upki_suaq ;
taav	upki_suaq ;
takan	upki_suaq ;
tappav	upki_suaq ; 
tappik	upki ;
taqqav	upki_suaq ; 
tasam	upki_suaq ; 
